Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202629-3918
Special counsel; appointment; procedure; cost; payment.

Nothing in sections 29-3910 to 29-3918 shall prevent a court from appointing counsel other than the public defender, the Commission on Public Advocacy, or county conflict counsel as defined in section 29-3934 to represent indigent defendants or other persons by law entitled to legal representation, but appointments of counsel other than the public defender, the commission, or county conflict counsel shall be limited to situations in which there are multiple defendants requiring separate representation or when other exigent circumstances are present which in the opinion of the court require appointment of counsel other than the public defender, the commission, or county conflict counsel. In all such cases of appointments of counsel other than the public defender, the commission, or county conflict counsel, the procedure shall be in accordance with sections 43-272 and 43-273 and the cost of such appointments shall be paid by the county as provided in such sections.

Laws 1969, c. 234, § 10, p. 866;

Laws 1988, LB 790, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1989), § 29-1805.10;

Laws 1990, LB 822, § 36;

Laws 2026, LB965, § 36.
July 18, 2026
Nebraska Juvenile Code, see section 43-2,129.

Appointment of counsel other than the public defender are limited to cases of multiple defendants requiring separate representation or circumstances which, in the court's opinion, require outside counsel. State v. Addison, 198 Neb. 166, 251 N.W.2d 895 (1977).